South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4343.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Nursing training requirements SECTION 1.    Article 1, Chapter 33, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-33-31.    (A)(1) In addition to other requirements of this chapter, successful completion of a one-hour human trafficking awareness and prevention course that meets the requirements of subsection (B) is a continuing education requirement for licensure renewal, reinstatement, or reactivation as a licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse. All licensees shall complete this course requirement before: (a) January 1, 2028, and every six years thereafter, for persons licensed before January 1, 2026; or (b) two years after initial licensure and every six years thereafter, for persons initially licensed on or after January 1, 2026. (2) The requirements of this subsection are in addition to any other continuing education requirements and licensure requirements in this chapter. (B) A human trafficking awareness and prevention course required by this section: (1) only may be provided by a continuing education provider approved by the State Board of Nursing; and (2) must include instruction on: (a) identifying suspected trafficking victims; (b) laws for reporting suspected trafficking victims; and (c) providing care and support to potential trafficking victims. (C) The State Board of Nursing shall adopt rules to implement this section in collaboration with the Director of the South Carolina Human Trafficking Task Force and the State Task Force Healthcare Subcommittee. Physician training requirements SECTION 2.    Article 1, Chapter 47, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-47-39.    (A)(1) In addition to other requirements of this article, successful completion of a one-hour human trafficking awareness and prevention course meeting the requirements of subsection (B) is a continuing education requirement for renewal of a physician license pursuant to Section 40-47-40 or the reinstatement or reactivation of a physician license pursuant to Section 40-47-30 for licensees practicing emergency medicine, primary care, internal medicine, family medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics, gynecology, or as a hospitalist, and those licensees working in public health clinics, emergency departments, urgent care centers, and community-based centers. All licensees subject to this section shall complete this course requirement before: (a) January 1, 2028, and every six years thereafter, for persons licensed before January 1, 2026; or (b) two years after initial licensure and every six years thereafter, for persons initially licensed on or after January 1, 2026. (2) The requirements of this subsection are to be counted as part of required continuing education requirements and in addition to any other requirements for any initial licensure, license renewal, and license reinstatement or reactivation in this article. (B) A human trafficking awareness and prevention course required by this section must contain information reviewed by the South Carolina Human Trafficking Task Force and the State Task Force Healthcare Subcommittee: (1) and only may be provided by: (a) a statewide organization recognized by the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education (ACCME) to recognize and accredit organizations in South Carolina offering continuing medical education; (b) a statewide organization approved to provide continuing medical education by its national organization which is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education; or (c) from an organization approved by the State Board of Medical Examiners; and (2) must include instruction on: (a) identifying suspected trafficking victims; (b) laws for reporting suspected trafficking victims; and (c) providing care and support to potential trafficking victims. (C) The State Board of Medical Examiners shall adopt rules to implement this section in collaboration with the Director of the South Carolina Human Trafficking Task Force and the State Task Force Healthcare Subcommittee. Physician assistant training requirements SECTION 3.    Article 7, Chapter 47, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-47-953.    (A)(1) In addition to other requirements of this article, evidence of successful completion of a one-hour human trafficking awareness and prevention course provided in subsection (B) is a continuing education requirement for the renewal of a physician assistant license. All licensees shall complete this course requirement before: (a) January 1, 2028, and every six years thereafter, for persons licensed before January 1, 2026; or (b) two years after initial licensure and every six years thereafter, for persons initially licensed on or after January 1, 2026. (2) The requirements of this subsection are in addition to any other continuing education requirements and other requirements for any initial licensure, license renewal, and license reinstatement or reactivation for physician assistants in this article. (B) A human trafficking awareness and prevention course required by this section: (1) only may be provided by a continuing education provider approved by the State Board of Medical Examiners; and (2) must include instruction on: (a) identifying suspected trafficking victims; (b) laws for reporting suspected trafficking victims; and (c) providing care and support to potential trafficking victims. (C) The State Board of Medical Examiners shall adopt rules to implement this section. Time effective SECTION 4.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 5th day of March, 2026. Approved the 9th day of March, 2026. __________